Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.080

Rule making.

(1) The department must adopt rules as necessary to implement the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

(2) By rule, the director may adopt a subsequent version of a federal statute or regulation referenced in this chapter.

[ 2018 c 106 s 8.]